Georgia, session 2025_26, HB580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Penmanship Act."
SECTION 2.
Part 2 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to competencies and core curriculum under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is
amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 580
- 1 -

LC 61 0159
"20-2-140.2.
(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each local board of education shall provide
instruction in cursive writing for such grades and grade levels as shall be determined by the
State Board of Education, which instruction may be incorporated into an existing course
of study.
(b) No later than January 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall adopt content
standards for such instruction in cursive writing and shall determine the appropriate grades
and grade levels for such instruction."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 580
- 2 -